Washington statutes.
RCW 18.17.060

Compact privilege to practice telehealth.

(1) Member states shall recognize the right of a licensed professional counselor, licensed by a home state in accordance with RCW 18.17.020 and under rules promulgated by the commission, to practice professional counseling in any member state via telehealth under a privilege to practice as provided in the compact and rules promulgated by the commission.

(2) A licensee providing professional counseling services in a remote state under the privilege to practice shall adhere to the laws and regulations of the remote state.

[ 2023 c 58 s 7.]